Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-433
Nebraska Sentencing Reform Task Force; created; duties; members; reports; termination.

(1) The Nebraska Sentencing Reform Task Force is created.

(2) The task force shall identify and recommend changes to Nebraska's criminal justice laws, policies, and practices to improve public safety and more effectively allocate Nebraska's criminal justice system resources.

(3) The task force shall consist of the following members:

(a) The Governor or the Governor's designee;

(b) The Attorney General or the Attorney General's designee;

(c) Three members of the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council;

(d) Two representatives of law enforcement appointed by the Governor;

(e) Two county attorneys appointed by the Governor; and

(f) Two criminal defense attorneys with at least ten years' experience appointed by the Governor.

(4) The task force shall submit its first report to the Legislature no later than November 15, 2023. The task force shall submit its second report to the Legislature no later than November 15, 2024. The reports shall be submitted electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature.

(5) Administrative and staff support for the task force shall be provided by any executive branch staff as directed by the Governor or by staff of the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature as directed by the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee.

(6) The task force terminates on December 31, 2024.

Laws 2023, LB50, § 19.